test/src/gt-desc-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-desc.ana.yaml
  Noun - niibedilli : # GOAHTI-I SgNomCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibedilli
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibedilis
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibedillái
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibe-dilli
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibe-dilis
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibe-dillái


  Noun - niibbidilli : # GOAHTI-I SgGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbidilli, niibbedilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbidilis, niibbedilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbidillái, niibbedillái]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [niibbi-dilli, niibbe-dilli]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [niibbi-dilis, niibbe-dilis]
    niibi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [niibbi-dillái, niibbe-dillái]

  Noun - niibbiiddilli : # GOAHTI-I PlGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibbiiddilli
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibbiiddilis
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibbiiddillái
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: niibbiid-dilli
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: niibbiid-dilis
    niibi+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: niibbiid-dillái
